Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1169.
do enact as follows:SB1169,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB1169,27Section 2. 20.490 (6) (e) of the statutes is created to read:SB1169,3,10820.490 (6) (e) First-time home buyer purchasing assistance fund. As a 9continuing appropriation, the amounts in the schedule for deposit into the first-10time home buyer purchasing assistance fund under s. 234.663 (2).SB1169,311Section 3. 234.663 of the statutes is created to read:SB1169,3,1612234.663 First-time home buyer purchasing assistance. (1) Definition. 13In this section, “area median income” means the area median family income in the 14county in which the home of a recipient of a loan under sub. (2) is located, adjusted 15for family size, as published annually by the federal department of housing and 16urban development.SB1169,3,2117(2) Establishment of fund. (a) There is established under the jurisdiction 18and control of the authority a first-time home buyer purchasing assistance fund, for 19the purpose of providing loans under sub. (4). The authority may use moneys in the 20fund to cover actual and necessary expenses incurred to accomplish the purposes of 21this section and administer the fund. The fund shall consist of all of the following:SB1169,3,23221. All moneys appropriated under s. 20.490 (6) (e) to the authority for the 23fund.SB1169,4,112. All moneys received from the repayment of loans under sub. (6).SB1169,4,42(b) In its discretion, the authority may invest fund moneys that are not 3required for immediate use or disbursement in all of the following to the extent 4lawful for fiduciaries in this state:SB1169,4,751. An obligation of the United States or one of its agencies or 6instrumentalities, or an obligation the principal and interest of which are 7guaranteed by the United States or one of its agencies or instrumentalities.SB1169,4,982. An obligation of any state, or of any county, city, or other political 9subdivision of a state, having long-term ratings in the AA category or higher.SB1169,4,10103. A certificate of deposit.SB1169,4,11114. The state investment fund.SB1169,4,13125. A money market mutual fund restricted to one or more investments as 13provided in subd. 1., 2., 3., or 4.SB1169,4,1514(c) All investments under par. (b) shall be the exclusive property of the fund. 15All earnings on or income from such investments shall be credited to the fund.SB1169,4,1616(d) No moneys in the fund may be invested under s. 234.03 (18).SB1169,4,1917(3) Establishment of loan program. The authority shall establish and 18administer a first-time home buyer purchasing assistance loan program for the 19purpose of awarding loans under this section.SB1169,5,220(4) Purchasing assistance loans. (a) From the first-time home buyer 21purchasing assistance fund, the authority may make a loan to an eligible recipient 22under sub. (5) for costs associated with purchasing a home, including closing costs, 1down payment costs, mortgage insurance costs, interest rate buy-down, and 2principal reduction.SB1169,5,53(b) A home purchased using a loan under this section may be single-family 4housing or multifamily housing up to 4 units and may be a manufactured or mobile 5home.SB1169,5,96(c) The amount of a loan provided under this section may not exceed $35,000 7or 10 percent of the purchase price of the home, whichever is less. The authority 8may, in its discretion, adjust the maximum loan amount to reflect market 9conditions.SB1169,5,1110(d) Loans provided under this section shall be interest-free and the authority 11may, in its discretion, defer payments on a loan.SB1169,5,1912(e) The authority shall forgive 12.5 percent of the original loan amount or the 13entirety of the remaining loan amount, whichever is less, 2.5 years after the loan is 14provided; 25 percent of the original loan amount or the entirety of the remaining 15loan amount, whichever is less, 5 years after the loan is provided; 37.5 percent of 16the original loan amount or the entirety of the remaining loan amount, whichever is 17less, 7.5 years after the loan is provided; and 50 percent of the original loan amount 18or the entirety of the remaining loan amount, whichever is less, 10 years after the 19loan is provided.SB1169,5,2320(f) If in any application cycle there are insufficient moneys available in the 21first-time home buyer purchasing assistance fund to fund all applications that meet 22the requirements under sub. (5) and are otherwise acceptable to the authority, the 23authority shall prioritize funding loans for purchasing single-family housing.SB1169,6,21(5) Eligibility. An individual is eligible for a loan under this section if all of 2the following conditions are met:SB1169,6,43(a) The individual has either never owned a home or owned a home but lost it 4due to foreclosure.SB1169,6,65(b) The individual’s household income is at or below 100 percent of the area 6median income at the time of receiving the loan.SB1169,6,87(c) The individual completes a home buyer education course approved by the 8authority.SB1169,6,99(d) The individual agrees to occupy the home as a primary residence.SB1169,6,1310(e) The individual agrees to purchase the home for an amount that is within 11the maximum loan amount established by the federal housing administration for 12the county in which the home is located and agrees to personally contribute no less 13than $1,000 toward down payment costs or closing costs.SB1169,6,1514(f) The individual agrees to finance the home using a first mortgage program 15administered by the authority.SB1169,6,1816(6) Repayment. (a) The total amount of unpaid principal on a loan under 17this section shall become due and payable upon the occurrence of any of the 18following:SB1169,6,19191. The recipient of the loan sells the home.SB1169,6,20202. The home ceases to be the primary residence of the recipient of the loan.SB1169,6,22213. The recipient of the loan subjects the home to an ineligible refinance, as 22determined by the authority.SB1169,7,214. The recipient of the loan otherwise violates the loan agreement between 2the recipient and the authority.SB1169,7,43(b) The authority may forgive an amount due under this subsection in the 4event of financial or personal hardship, as determined by the authority.SB1169,7,55